testing/smn-tests.yaml
  Noun - taho: # â-stems
    taho+N+Sg+Nom: taho
    taho+N+Sg+Gen: tavo
    taho+N+Sg+Ill: tahon
    taho+N+Sg+Loc: tavvoost
    taho+N+Sg+Com: tavvooin
    taho+N+Ess: tahhoon
    taho+N+Pl+Abe: tavoiittáá

  Noun - kámppá: # â-stems
    kámppá+N+Sg+Nom: kámppá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Gen: kámpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Ill: káámpán
    kámppá+N+Sg+Loc: kámppáást
    kámppá+N+Sg+Com: kámppáin
    kámppá+N+Ess: kámppán
    kámppá+N+Pl+Abe: kámpáittáá

  Noun - juŋkká: # â-stems
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Nom: juŋkká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Gen: juŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Ill: juuŋkán
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Loc: juŋkkáást
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Com: juŋkkáin
    juŋkká+N+Ess: juŋkkán
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Abe: juŋkáittáá

  Noun - teltta: # â-stems
    teltta+N+Sg+Nom: teltta
    teltta+N+Sg+Gen: telta
    teltta+N+Sg+Ill: teeltan
    teltta+N+Sg+Loc: telttaast
    teltta+N+Sg+Com: telttaain
    teltta+N+Ess: telttan
    teltta+N+Pl+Abe: teltaittáá

  Noun - asto: # â-stems
    asto+N+Sg+Nom: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill: aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc: astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com: astooin
    asto+N+Ess: aston
    asto+N+Pl+Abe: astoittáá

  Noun - čuhčá: # â-stems
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom: čuhčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen: čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill: čuuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc: čuuvčást
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com: čuvččáin
    čuhčá+N+Ess: čuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe: čuvčáittáá

  Noun - sivlá: # â-stems
    sivlá+N+Sg+Nom: sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Gen: siivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Ill: siivlán
    sivlá+N+Sg+Loc: siivlást
    sivlá+N+Sg+Com: sivláin
    sivlá+N+Ess: sivlán
    sivlá+N+Pl+Abe: sivláittáá

  Noun - cijkko: # â-stems
    cijkko+N+Sg+Nom: cijkko
    cijkko+N+Sg+Gen: ciijho
    cijkko+N+Sg+Ill: ciijkon
    cijkko+N+Sg+Loc: ciijhost
    cijkko+N+Sg+Com: cijhhooin
    cijkko+N+Ess: cijkkon
    cijkko+N+Pl+Abe: cijhoittáá

  Noun - njamma: # â-stems
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom: njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen: njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill: njaaman
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc: njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com: njammain
    njamma+N+Ess: njamman
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe: njamaittáá

  Noun - hellá: # â-stems
    hellá+N+Sg+Nom: hellá
    hellá+N+Sg+Gen: helá
    hellá+N+Sg+Ill: heelánn
    hellá+N+Sg+Loc: helláást
    hellá+N+Sg+Com: helláin
    hellá+N+Ess: hellán
    hellá+N+Pl+Abe: heláittáá

  Noun - pirrá: # â-stems
    pirrá+N+Sg+Nom: pirrá
    pirrá+N+Sg+Gen: pirá
    pirrá+N+Sg+Ill: piirán
    pirrá+N+Sg+Loc: pirráást
    pirrá+N+Sg+Com: pirráin
    pirrá+N+Ess: pirrán
    pirrá+N+Pl+Abe: piráittáá

  Noun - millo: # â-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miilon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: millooin
    millo+N+Ess: millon
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miloittáá

  Noun - sukká: # â-stems
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom: sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen: suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill: suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc: suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com: suháin
    sukká+N+Ess: sukkán
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe: suháittáá

  Noun - mitto: # â-stems
    mitto+N+Sg+Nom: mitto
    mitto+N+Sg+Gen: mito
    mitto+N+Sg+Ill: miiton
    mitto+N+Sg+Loc: mittoost
    mitto+N+Sg+Com: mittooin
    mitto+N+Ess: mitton
    mitto+N+Pl+Abe: mitoittáá

  Noun - čuájá: # â-stems
    čuájá+N+Sg+Nom: čuájá
    čuájá+N+Sg+Gen: čuájá
    čuájá+N+Sg+Ill: čuáján
    čuájá+N+Sg+Loc: čuájáást
    čuájá+N+Sg+Com: čuájáin
    čuájá+N+Ess: čuáiján
    čuájá+N+Pl+Abe: čuájáittáá

  Noun - čááná: # â-stems
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen: čáná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill: čáánán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc: čáánáást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Ess: čáánnán
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe: čánáittáá

  Noun - ráátá: # â-stems
    ráátá+N+Sg+Nom: ráátá
    ráátá+N+Sg+Gen: ráđá
    ráátá+N+Sg+Ill: ráátán
    ráátá+N+Sg+Loc: rááđáást
    ráátá+N+Sg+Com: rááđáin
    ráátá+N+Ess: rááttán
    ráátá+N+Pl+Abe: ráđáittáá

  Noun - siäsá: # â-stems
    siäsá+N+Sg+Nom: siäsá
    siäsá+N+Sg+Gen: siäsá
    siäsá+N+Sg+Ill: siäsán
    siäsá+N+Sg+Loc: siäsást
    siäsá+N+Sg+Com: siäsáin
    siäsá+N+Ess: siässán
    siäsá+N+Pl+Abe: siäsáittáá

  Noun - riäčá: # â-stems
    riäčá+N+Sg+Nom: riäčá
    riäčá+N+Sg+Gen: riäjá
    riäčá+N+Sg+Ill: riäčán
    riäčá+N+Sg+Loc: riäjást
    riäčá+N+Sg+Com: riäjáin
    riäčá+N+Ess: riäččán
    riäčá+N+Pl+Abe: riäjáittáá

  Noun - čiähá: # â-stems
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom: čiähá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen: čiävá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill: čiähán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc: čiävást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com: čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Ess: čiähán
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe: čiäváittáá

  Noun - hiävlá: # â-stems
    hiävlá+N+Sg+Nom: hiävlá
    hiävlá+N+Sg+Gen: hiävlá
    hiävlá+N+Sg+Ill: hiävlán
    hiävlá+N+Sg+Loc: hiävlást
    hiävlá+N+Sg+Com: hiävláin
    hiävlá+N+Ess: hiävlán
    hiävlá+N+Pl+Abe: hiävláittáá

  Noun - lášká: # â-stems
    lášká+N+Sg+Nom: lášká
    lášká+N+Sg+Gen: láášká
    lášká+N+Sg+Ill: lááškán
    lášká+N+Sg+Loc: láškást
    lášká+N+Sg+Com: láškáin
    lášká+N+Ess: láškán
    lášká+N+Pl+Abe: láškáittáá

  Noun - hiärrä: # â-stems
    hiärrä+N+Sg+Nom: hiärrä
    hiärrä+N+Sg+Gen: hiärä
    hiärrä+N+Sg+Ill: hiärän
    hiärrä+N+Sg+Loc: hiäräst
    hiärrä+N+Sg+Com: hiärráin
    hiärrä+N+Ess: hiärrán
    hiärrä+N+Pl+Abe: hiäráittáá

  Noun - kuáddá: # â-stems
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Nom: kuáddá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Gen: kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Ill: kuádán
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Loc: kuádást
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Com: kuáddáin
    kuáddá+N+Ess: kuáddán
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Abe: kuádáittáá

  Noun - kákká: # â-stems
    kákká+N+Sg+Nom: kákká
    kákká+N+Sg+Gen: kááhá
    kákká+N+Sg+Ill: káákán
    kákká+N+Sg+Loc: kááhást
    kákká+N+Sg+Com: káhháin
    kákká+N+Ess: kákkán
    kákká+N+Pl+Abe: káháittáá

  Noun - njune: # e-stems
    njune+N+Sg+Nom: njune
    njune+N+Sg+Gen: njune
    njune+N+Sg+Ill: njunán
    njune+N+Sg+Loc: njuuneest
    njune+N+Sg+Com: njuunijn
    njune+N+Ess: njunneen
    njune+N+Pl+Abe: njunijttáá

  Noun - kyeli: # i-e-á-stems
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom: kyeli
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill: kuálán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc: kyeleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Ess: kyellin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe: kuolijttáá

  Noun - ergi: # i-á-stems
    ergi+N+Sg+Nom: ergi
    ergi+N+Sg+Gen: eergi
    ergi+N+Sg+Ill: iärgán
    ergi+N+Sg+Loc: eergist
    ergi+N+Sg+Com: ergijn
    ergi+N+Ess: ergin
    ergi+N+Pl+Abe: ergijttáá



#  Noun - vahe: # â-stems
#    vahe+N+Sg+Nom: vahe
#    vahe+N+Sg+Gen: vahe
#    vahe+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    vahe+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    vahe+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    vahe+N+Ess: vahen
#    vahe+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - tupe: # â-stems
#    tupe+N+Sg+Nom: tupe
#    tupe+N+Sg+Gen: tupe
#    tupe+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    tupe+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    tupe+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    tupe+N+Ess: tupen
#    tupe+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - čuđe: # â-stems
#    čuđe+N+Sg+Nom: čuđe
#    čuđe+N+Sg+Gen: čuđe
#    čuđe+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    čuđe+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    čuđe+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    čuđe+N+Ess: čuđen
#    čuđe+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - mane: # â-stems
#    mane+N+Sg+Nom: mane
#    mane+N+Sg+Gen: mane
#    mane+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    mane+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    mane+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    mane+N+Ess: manen
#    mane+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - kope: # â-stems
#    kope+N+Sg+Nom: kope
#    kope+N+Sg+Gen: kope
#    kope+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    kope+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    kope+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    kope+N+Ess: kopen
#    kope+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - iše: # â-stems
#    iše+N+Sg+Nom: iše
#    iše+N+Sg+Gen: iše
#    iše+N+Sg+Ill: išen
#    iše+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    iše+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    iše+N+Ess: išen
#    iše+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - ase: # â-stems
#    ase+N+Sg+Nom: ase
#    ase+N+Sg+Gen: ase
#    ase+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    ase+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    ase+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    ase+N+Ess: asen
#    ase+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - skoče: # â-stems
#    skoče+N+Sg+Nom: skoče
#    skoče+N+Sg+Gen: skoče
#    skoče+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    skoče+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    skoče+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    skoče+N+Ess: skočen
#    skoče+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - ahe: # â-stems
#    ahe+N+Sg+Nom: ahe
#    ahe+N+Sg+Gen: ahe
#    ahe+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    ahe+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    ahe+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    ahe+N+Ess: ahen
#    ahe+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - kurtte: # â-stems
#    kurtte+N+Sg+Nom: kurtte
#    kurtte+N+Sg+Gen: kurtte
#    kurtte+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    kurtte+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    kurtte+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    kurtte+N+Ess: kurtten
#    kurtte+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#
#
#  Noun - kääri: # â-stems
#    kääri+N+Sg+Nom: kääri
#    kääri+N+Sg+Gen: kääri
#    kääri+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    kääri+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    kääri+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    kääri+N+Ess: käärin
#    kääri+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - pääti: # â-stems
#    pääti+N+Sg+Nom: pääti
#    pääti+N+Sg+Gen: pääti
#    pääti+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    pääti+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    pääti+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    pääti+N+Ess: päätin
#    pääti+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá
#
#  Noun - čeeci: # â-stems
#    čeeci+N+Sg+Nom: čeeci
#    čeeci+N+Sg+Gen: čeeci
#    čeeci+N+Sg+Ill: n
#    čeeci+N+Sg+Loc: st
#    čeeci+N+Sg+Com: áin
#    čeeci+N+Ess: čeecin
#    čeeci+N+Pl+Abe: ittáá

#  Noun - vuoli: # â-stems
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
#
#  Noun - vuoli: # â-stems
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
#
#  Noun - vuoli: # â-stems
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
#
#  Noun - vuoli: # â-stems
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
#
#
#
